incubator/apertium-hi.hi_WX.dix
    <pardef n="l/e__v">
      <e><p><l>ekara</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:kara"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iyA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>iye</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ie</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>I</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IM</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:yA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:any"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Uz</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eM</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>o</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Ijie</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>Ijiye</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eM</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:any"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ene</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>enIM</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:nA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ewA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ewe</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ewI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ewIM</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:any"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:wA"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UzgA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiyegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMge</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oge</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiyegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMge</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>UzgI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiyegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>egI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMgI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ogI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiyegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>IjiegA</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eMgI</l><r>e<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="tam:future"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="le"><i>l</i><par n="l/e__v"/></e>
    <e lm="xe"><i>x</i><par n="l/e__v"/></e>
